apertium-wbp.wbp.lexc
LEXICON ObjectAux
# ; 
%<obj1sg%>:ju SubjectObjectAux ;!%{I%}
%<obj2sg%>:ngku SubjectObjectAux ;!%{I%}
%<obj3sg%>:rla SubjectObjectAux ;
%<obj1duincl%>:ngali SubjectObjectAux ;
%<obj1duincl%>:ngalingki SubjectObjectAux ;
%<obj1duexcl%>:jarrangku SubjectObjectAux ;
%<obj1plincl%>:ngalpa SubjectObjectAux ;
%<obj1plexcl%>:nganpa SubjectObjectAux ;
%<obj2du%>:ngku-pala SubjectObjectAux ;
%<obj2pl%>:nyarra SubjectObjectAux ;
%<obj3du%>:palangu SubjectObjectAux ;
%<obj3pl%>:jana SubjectObjectAux ;


!LEXICON PronomRoot -- copied from below
!ngaju:ng Pronomial_p1 ;
!nyuntu:ny Pronomial ;
!nyanungu:ny Pronomial ;
!ngali:ng Pronomial_p1 ;
!ngajarra:ng Pronomial_p1 ;
!ngalipa:ng Pronomial_p1 ;
!nganimpa:ng Pronomial_p1 ;
!nyumpala:ny Pronomial ;
!nyurrarla:ny Pronomial ;
!nyanungu%-jarra:ny Pronomial;
!nyanungu:ny Pronomial;


LEXICON Pronomial
ngaju%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:ngaju Dash_CaseSuffix ;
ngaju%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:ngajulu Dash_CaseSuffix ; ! Dir/LR
ngaju%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:ngaju-lu Dash_CaseSuffix ; ! Dir/LR
nyuntu%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:nyuntu Dash_CaseSuffix ;
nyuntu%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:nyuntulu Dash_CaseSuffix ; ! Dir/LR
nyuntu%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:nyuntu-lu Dash_CaseSuffix ; ! Dir/LR
nyanungu%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:nyanungu Dash_CaseSuffix ;
ngali%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<du%>%<incl%>:ngali Dash_CaseSuffix ;
ngali%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<du%>%<incl%>:ngalijarra Dash_CaseSuffix ; ! Dir/LR
ngali%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<du%>%<incl%>:ngali-jarra Dash_CaseSuffix ; ! Dir/LR
ngajarra%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<du%>%<excl%>:ngajarra Dash_CaseSuffix ; 
ngalipa%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<incl%>:ngalipa Dash_CaseSuffix ;
nganimpa%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<excl%>:nganimpa Dash_CaseSuffix ;
nyumpala%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<du%>:nyumpala Dash_CaseSuffix ; 
nyurrarla%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:nyurrarla Dash_CaseSuffix ;
nyanungu-jarra%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<du%>:nyanungu-jarra Dash_CaseSuffix ;
nyanungu%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:nyanungu-rra Dash_CaseSuffix ;  
nyanungu%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:nyanungu-patu Dash_CaseSuffix ;  


!%<prn%>%<pers%>: PronomPersonNumber ;

!LEXICON Pronomial_p1
!%<prn%>%<pers%>: PronomPersonNumber_p1 ;

!LEXICON PronomPersonNumber
!%<p2%>%<sg%>:untu # ;
!%<p2%>%<sg%>:untu%>lu # ;
!%<p3%>%<sg%>:anungu # ;
!%<p2%>%<du%>:umpala # ;
!%<p2%>%<pl%>:urrarla # ;
!%<p3%>%<du%>:anungu%-jarra # ;
!%<p3%>%<pl%>:anungu%-rra # ;
!%<p3%>%<pl%>:anungu%-patu # ;

!LEXICON PronomPersonNumber_p1
!%<p1%>%<sg%>:aju # ;
!%<p1%>%<sg%>:aju%>lu # ;
!%<p1%>%<du%>%<incl%>:ali # ;
!%<p1%>%<du%>%<incl%>:ali%>jarra # ;
!%<p1%>%<du%>%<excl%>:ajarra # ;
!%<p1%>%<pl%>%<incl%>:alipa # ;
!%<p1%>%<pl%>%<excl%>:animpa # ;

LEXICON Conjunction
%<cnjcoo%>: # ;

LEXICON Adjective
%<adj%>: Dash_CaseSuffix ;
%<adj%>%<subst%>: Dash_CaseSuffix ;
! %<adj%>: CaseSuffix ;
! %<adj%>%<subst%>: CaseSuffix ;

LEXICON NounNumber_2vow
%<n%>%<sg%>: Dash_CaseSuffix_2vow ;
%<n%>%<du%>:%-jarra Dash_CaseSuffix ;
%<n%>%<du%>:jarra Dash_CaseSuffix ;! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<pl%>%<poss%>:%-nyanu Dash_CaseSuffix ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<poss%>:nyanu Dash_CaseSuffix ;! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<pl%>:%-patu Dash_CaseSuffix ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:patu Dash_CaseSuffix ;! Dir/LR

LEXICON NounNumber
%<n%>%<sg%>: Dash_CaseSuffix ;
%<n%>%<du%>:%-jarra Dash_CaseSuffix ;
%<n%>%<du%>:jarra Dash_CaseSuffix ;! Dir/LR 
%<n%>%<pl%>:%-patu Dash_CaseSuffix ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:patu Dash_CaseSuffix ;! Dir/LR 

LEXICON CaseSuffix_2vow
!%<dat%>:-k%{U%} Topic ;
%<dat%>:k%{U%} Topic ; ! Dir/LR 
%<erg%>:ngku Topic ; !%{I%}
%<all%>:kurra Topic ; !
%<all%>:kirra Topic ; ! Dir/LR 
%<com%>:ngkajinta Topic ;
%<ela%>:ngurlu # ; !%{I%}
%<loc%>:ngka Topic ;

LEXICON CaseSuffix
!%<dat%>:-k%{U%} Topic ;
%<dat%>:k%{U%} Topic ; ! Dir/LR 
%<erg%>:rlu NounTense ; !%{I%}
%<erg%>:rlu Topic ; ! Dir/LR 
%<erg%>:rlu Dash_SubjectAux ; ! Dir/LR 
%<all%>:kurra Topic ;
%<all%>:kirra Topic ; ! Dir/LR 
%<com%>:rlajinta Topic ;
%<ela%>:ngurlu Topic ;
%<loc%>:rla Topic ;

LEXICON Dash_CaseSuffix_2vow
%<sim%>:%-piya # ;
%<abs%>: Clitic_CaseSuffix_2vow ;
:%>%- Clitic_CaseSuffix_2vow ; 
: NounTense ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON Dash_CaseSuffix
%<sim%>:%-piya # ;
%<abs%>: Clitic_CaseSuffix ;
: Clitic_CaseSuffix ;
: NounTense ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON Numeral
%<num%>:%-pala # ;
%<num%>:pala # ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>: # ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON Adverb
%<adv%>: # ;
%<adv%>:%>%- Adverb_ObjectAux ;
%<adv%>:%> Adverb_ObjectAux ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON Adverb_ObjectAux
# ; 
%<obj1sg%>:ju SubjectObjectAux ;!%{I%}
%<obj2sg%>:ngku SubjectObjectAux ;!%{I%}
%<obj3sg%>:rla Dash_CaseSuffix ;
%<obj1duincl%>:ngali SubjectObjectAux ;
%<obj1duincl%>:ngalingki SubjectObjectAux ;
%<obj1duexcl%>:jarrangku SubjectObjectAux ;
%<obj1plincl%>:ngalpa SubjectObjectAux ;
%<obj1plexcl%>:nganpa SubjectObjectAux ;
%<obj2du%>:ngku-pala SubjectObjectAux ;
%<obj2pl%>:nyarra SubjectObjectAux ;
%<obj3du%>:palangu SubjectObjectAux ;
%<obj3pl%>:jana SubjectObjectAux ;

LEXICON Topic
# ; 
%<top%>:ju # ;
%<top%>:%-ju # ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON Clitic_CaseSuffix
: # ;
:%- Clitic ;
: Clitic ; ! Dir/LR
:%> CaseSuffix ; ! Dir/LR
:%>%- CaseSuffix ;

LEXICON Clitic_CaseSuffix_2vow
: # ;
:%- Clitic ;
: Clitic ; ! Dir/LR
:%> CaseSuffix_2vow ; ! Dir/LR
:%>%- CaseSuffix_2vow ; 

LEXICON Clitic
%<mod%>:juku # ;
%<mod%>:nyayirni # ; 
%<mod%>:kari # ;
%<mod%>:wiyi # ;
%<mod%>:yijala # ;
%<mod%>:puka # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON AuxRoot
TenseAux ;
!ka:kulaka TenseAux ;
!kajilpa:ka TenseAux ;
!kalaka:ka TenseAux ;
!kulaka:ka TenseAux ;

LEXICON PronomRoot1
ngaju:ng Pronomial_p1 ;
nyuntu:nyuntu Pronomial ;
nyanungu:ny Pronomial ;
ngali:ng Pronomial_p1 ;
ngajarra:ng Pronomial_p1 ;
ngalipa:ng Pronomial_p1 ;
nganimpa:ng Pronomial_p1 ;
nyumpala:ny Pronomial ;
nyurrarla:ny Pronomial ;
nyanungu%-jarra:ny Pronomial;
nyanungu:ny Pronomial;

LEXICON PronomRoot
Pronomial ;

LEXICON ConjRoot
manu:manu Conjunction ;
kapu:kapu Conjunction ;

LEXICON AdjRoot
mari:mari Adjective ;
pampa:pampa Adjective ;
wita:wita Adjective ;
wiri:wiri Adjective ;
ngurrju:ngurrju Adjective ; ! good
kawarta:kawarta Adjective ;
kardirri:kardirri Adjective ; ! white
kilji:kilji Adjective ; ! fast or loud
kuwalypa:kuwalypa Adjective ; ! limp
jinta:jinta Adjective ; ! alone
kalypa:kalypa Adjective ; ! soft
rdangkarlpa:rdangkarlpa Adjective ; ! short
kirrirdi:kirrirdi Adjective ; ! long
kunjuru-kunjuru:kunjuru-kunjuru Adjective ; ! blue
yukiri-kiri:yukiri-kiri Adjective ; ! green
tirirtiri:tirirtiri Adjective ; ! red
paarrpa-paarrpa:paarrpa-paarrpa Adjective ; ! sore, painful
pulya:pulya Adjective ; ! quiet
jampu:jampu Adjective ; ! left
jampu-karra:jampu-karra Adjective ; ! left-handed
pulyurr-pulyurrpa:pulyurr-pulyurrpa Adjective ; ! gray
rurla-rurla:rurla-rurla Adjective ; ! swollen
lulku:lulku Adjective ; ! large
karntawarra-karntawarra:karntawarra-karntawarra Adjective ; ! yellow
yirrikarrika:yirrikarrika Adjective ; ! unfriendly
rama:rama Adjective ; ! drunk
warlu:warlu Adjective ; ! hot
murntu:murntu Adjective ; ! cooked
kaalypirri:kaalypirri Adjective ; ! cold
rarralypa:rarralypa Adjective ; ! easy
nguurl-nguurlpa:nguurl-nguurlpa Adjective ; ! exhausted
warlu:warlu Adjective ; ! angry
manamparra:manamparra Adjective ; ! healthy
kalypa:kalypa Adjective ; ! soft
jaka-ngalya:jaka-ngalya Adjective; ! full
ngayarrka:ngayarrka Adjective; ! pregnant
nyurltu-nyurltu:nyurltu-nyurltu Adjective; ! tangled or garbled
yijardu:yijardu Adjective ; ! true
tarnnga:tarnnga Adjective ; ! forever
junga:junga Adjective ; ! right side, true
-nyayirni-wangu:-nyayirni-wangu Adjective ; ! sacred
wakurturdu:wakurturdu Adjective ; ! fast

LEXICON NounRoot
marlu:marlu NounNumber_2vow ;
kurdu:kurdu NounNumber_2vow ; ! child
jarra:jarra NounNumber_2vow ;
yapa:yapa NounNumber_2vow ; ! person
pampa:pampa NounNumber_2vow ;
jarntu:jarntu NounNumber_2vow ; ! dog
warlu:warlu NounNumber_2vow ; ! fire
yapa:yapa NounNumber_2vow ; ! person
puku:puku NounNumber_2vow ; ! book
karru:karru NounNumber_2vow ; ! creek
ngapa:ngapa NounNumber_2vow ; ! rain
jarda:jarda NounNumber_2vow ; ! sleep
nyinyi:nyinyi NounNumber_2vow ; ! bird
nurnpu:nurnpu NounNumber_2vow ; ! mouse
pama:pama NounNumber_2vow ; ! liquor
milpa:milpa NounNumber_2vow ; ! eye
kara:kara NounNumber_2vow ; ! salt
lirra:lirra NounNumber_2vow ; ! voice
ngapa:ngapa NounNumber_2vow ; ! water
walya:walya NounNumber_2vow ; ! ground
wanta:wanta NounNumber_2vow ; ! year
mula:mula NounNumber_2vow ; ! egg
juka:juka NounNumber_2vow ; ! sugar or cousin
jurru:jurru NounNumber_2vow ; ! head
turnu:turnu NounNumber_2vow ; ! group/gathering
yalyu:yalyu NounNumber_2vow ; ! blood
japi:japi NounNumber_2vow ; ! entrance
ngurra:ngurra NounNumber_2vow ; ! residence
putu:putu NounNumber_2vow ; ! shoe
larrpa:larrpa NounNumber_2vow ; ! skeleton
kaku:kaku NounNumber_2vow ; ! sister
kuyu:kuyu NounNumber_2vow ; ! meat
marra-marra:marra-marra NounNumber_2vow ; ! angel
palya:palya NounNumber_2vow ; ! wax
murru:murru NounNumber_2vow ; ! sore
panji:panji NounNumber_2vow ; ! bed
rdilyki:rdilyki NounNumber_2vow ; ! fragment
mirdi:mirdi NounNumber_2vow ; ! knee
rdaka:rdaka NounNumber_2vow ; ! hand
wirlki:wirlki NounNumber_2vow ; ! boomerang
puru:puru NounNumber_2vow ; ! theft
kaja:kaja NounNumber_2vow ; ! son
karnta:karnta NounNumber_2vow ; ! woman
lipa:lipa NounNumber_2vow ; ! drawing
ngarrka:ngarrka NounNumber_2vow ; ! married man
miyi:miyi NounNumber_2vow ; ! food
ngulya:ngulya NounNumber_2vow ; ! burrow
langa:langa NounNumber_2vow ; ! ear
karli:karli NounNumber_2vow ; ! boomerang
wati:wati NounNumber_2vow ; ! man
yangka:yangka NounNumber_2vow ; ! aforementioned one
yimi:yimi NounNumber_2vow ; ! speech, story
ngurlu:ngurlu NounNumber_2vow ; ! seed
wawirri:wawirri NounNumber ;
maliki:maliki NounNumber ;
minija:minija NounNumber ; ! cat
marnilpa:marnilpa NounNumber ; ! hair
katarni:katarni NounNumber ; ! cotton
wirliya:wirliya NounNumber ; ! foot
mayawunpa:mayawunpa NounNumber ; ! wind/air
jiwirnpa:jiwirnpa NounNumber ; ! wing
kapurdu:kapurdu NounNumber ; ! football
marumpu:marumpu NounNumber ; ! hand
jamaru:jamaru NounNumber ; ! mouth
lirra-pin-pinpa:lirra-pin-pinpa NounNumber ; ! lip
kuwana:kuwana NounNumber ; ! lizard
jupu-jupu:jupu-jupu NounNumber ; ! soup
kawurlu:kawurlu NounNumber ; ! gold
wapirra:wapirra NounNumber ; ! God
marayarla:marayarla NounNumber ; ! soldier
jirrjinti:jirrjinti NounNumber ; ! sneeze
yurlkurrpa:yurlkurrpa NounNumber ; ! soap
kirdirrpa:kirdirrpa NounNumber ; ! cave or jail
japirdimi:japirdimi NounNumber ; ! collar
jirnarri:jirnarri NounNumber ; ! food
pintiji-manu:pintiji-manu NounNumber ; ! blister
mukarti:mukarti NounNumber ; ! hat
mirntangali:mirntangali NounNumber ; ! noon
jimanta:jimanta NounNumber ; ! shoulder
ngardarri-kirlangu:ngardarri-kirlangu NounNumber ; ! priest
malurnpa:malurnpa NounNumber ; ! shelter
mulkunju:mulkunju NounNumber ; ! grass
nalija:nalija NounNumber ; ! tea
jampita:jampita NounNumber ; ! cup
yungkurnu:yungkurnu NounNumber ; ! bone
wanjilypiri:wanjilypiri NounNumber ; ! star
warlapirti:warlapirti NounNumber ; ! leg
jamana-kiri:jamana-kiri NounNumber ; ! sandal
yumurru:yumurru NounNumber ; ! hair/fur
mujunyku:mujunyku NounNumber ; ! rabbit
minyinjirri:minyinjirri NounNumber ; ! cockroach
kurlumpurrngu:kurlumpurrngu NounNumber ; ! trumpet
jurnarrpa:jurnarrpa NounNumber ; ! clothes
liwanja:liwanja NounNumber ; ! fish
yutarlki:yutarlki NounNumber ; ! heart
matirdiji:matirdiji NounNumber ; ! four
yutarlki:yutarlki NounNumber ; ! heart
miparrpa:miparrpa NounNumber ; ! face or person
pakarli:pakarli NounNumber ; ! headdress or paper
minngarli:minngarli NounNumber ; ! tears
makiti:makiti NounNumber ; ! rifle
Jakamarra:Jakamarra NounNumber ; ! Jakamarra (a name)
Napaljarri:Napaljarri NounNumber ; ! Napaljarri (a name)
Nangala:Nangala NounNumber ; ! Nangala (a name)
Jijajiji:Jijajiji NounNumber ; ! Jesus
parraja:parraja NounNumber ; ! coolmamon
